en: Potato crisps in olive oil
bg: Картофен чипс с маслиново масло
de: Kartoffelchips mit Olivenöl
es: Chips de patatas fritas en aceite de oliva
fi: Perunalastut oliiviöljyllä
fr: Chips de pommes de terre à l’huile d'olive
hr: Čips od krumpira u maslinovom ulju
it: Patatine di patata in olio d'oliva
lt: Bulvių traškučiai alyvuogių aliejuje
nl: Aardappelchips gebakken in olijfolie

en: Potato crisps in coco oil
fr: Chips de pommes de terre à l’huile de coco
hr: Čips od krumpira u kokosovom ulju
lt: Bulvių traškučiai kokosų aliejuje
nl: Aardappelchips in kokosolie

en: Flavoured potato crisps
de: Aromatisierte Kartoffelchips
es: Chips de patatas fritas con sabores
fi: maustetut perunalastut
fr: Chips de pommes de terre aromatisées
hr: Aromatizirani čips od krumpira
it: Patatine aromatizzate
lt: Traškučiai su skoniu
nl: Aardappelchips met smaak
pt: Batatas fritas aromatizadas

en: Truffle crisps
fr: Chips saveur truffe

en: Ketchup crisps
de: Ketchup Chips
fr: Chips saveur ketchup, Chips au ketchup
hr: Kečap čips
lt: Kečupo traškučiai
nl: Ketchup chips

en: Salt and pepper crisps
de: Salz und Pfeffer Chips
fr: Chips au sel et au poivre
hr: Sol i papar čips
lt: Druskos ir pipirų traškučiai
nl: Zout en peperchips

en: Roasted chicken crisps, Roasted chicken and thyme crisps
de: Brathuhn-Thymnian Chips
fi: Kana-timjami-perunalastut
fr: Chips saveur poulet rôti, Chips au poulet rôti et thym
hr: Pečenu piletinu i čips od majčine dušice
lt: Keptos vištienos ir čiobrelių traškučiai
nl: Geroosterde kip chips, Geroosterde kip met tijm chips

en: Paprika crisps
bg: Чипс с паприка
de: Paprikachips
fi: Paprikaperunalastut
fr: Chips au paprika
hr: Čips od paprike
it: Patatine alla paprica
lt: Paprikos traškučiai
nl: Paprikachips

en: Bolognese crisps
de: Bolognese Chips
fr: Chips saveur bolognaise, Chips bolognaise
hr: Bolognese čips
lt: Bolonijos traškučiai
nl: Bolognese chips

en: Mustard crisps
de: Senf Chips
es: Patatas fritas con mostaza
fr: Chips à la moutarde, Chips moutarde
it: Patatine al senape
lt: Garstyčių traškučiai
nl: Mosterdchips
pt: Batatas fritas com mostarda
ru: Чипсы с горчицей

en: Cheese and onion crisps
bg: Чипс със сирене и лук
de: Käse-Zwiebel Chips
fr: Chips fromage et oignon, Chips fromage et onion
hr: Hrskavice od sira i luka
lt: Sūrio ir svogūnų traškučiai
nl: Kaas en ui chips

en: Cheddar and onion crisps
de: Cheddar-Zwiebel Chips
fr: Chips cheddar et oignon, Chips cheddar et onion
hr: Cheddar i čips od luka
lt: Čederio ir svogūnų traškučiai
nl: Cheddar en ui chips

en: Barbecue crisps
de: Barbecue Chips
fi: Grillimaustetut perunalastut, Barbeque-perunalastut
fr: Chips saveur barbecue, Chips barbecue
hr: Čips za roštilj
it: Patatine barbecue
lt: Barbekiu traškučiai
nl: Barbecuesmaak chips
pl: Chipsy barbecue, Czipsy barbecue

en: Dill and chive crisps
da: Dild og purløgschips
sv: Dill och gräslökschips

en: Ranch crisps
da: Ranch-chips
sv: Ranch-chips

en: Salt and vinegar crisps
da: Salt og eddike-chips, Salt & vinegar chips
de: Salz und Essig Chips
fi: Suola-etikka-perunalastut
fr: Chips au sel et vinaigre
hr: Sol i ocat čips
ja: ソルト・アンド・ビネガー・チップス
lt: Druskos ir acto traškučiai
nl: Zout en azijn chips
sv: Salt och vinäger-chips, Salt & vinegar chips

en: Salt and malt vinegar crisps
de: Salz und Malzessig Chips
fr: Chips au sel et vinaigre de malt
hr: Sol i čips od octa od slada
lt: Druskos ir salyklo acto traškučiai
nl: Zout-azijn chips

en: Sour cream and onion crisps, Sourcream and onion crisps, Sour cream and onion chips, Sourcream and onion chips
da: Syrnet fløde og løg-chips, Sourcream & onion chips
sv: Gräddfil och lök-chips, Sourcream & onion chips

en: Sour cream and sweet chilli crisps
de: Sauerrahm und Chilli Chips
fr: Chips à la crème fraîche et au piment doux
hr: Kiselo vrhnje i slatki chilli čips
lt: Grietinės ir saldžiųjų čili traškučių
nl: Zure room en chili chips

en: Crisps of red potatoes, red potato crisps, red potatoes crisps
da: Røde kartoffelchips, Chips af røde kartofler
de: Rote Kartoffelchips, Chips aus roten Kartoffeln
fr: Chips de pommes de terre rouge
hr: Čips od crvenog krumpira
lt: Raudonųjų bulvių traškučiai
nl: Rode aardappelchips